Massachusetts, session 194th, H5026.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 15A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 19G the following section:-
Section 19H.
(a) Institutions of higher education shall not withhold a student's official academic
transcripts for any academic credits and grades for any course for which a student’s tuition and
mandatory course fees are paid in full. An institution may withhold official transcripts for
academic credits and grades for any course for which a student's tuition and mandatory course
fees are not paid in full. For students paying on a per semester basis, such an institution may
withhold a student’s academic credits or grades for any course taken in a semester for which that
student’s tuition and mandatory course fees have not been paid.
(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent an institution of higher education
from withholding a student's diploma or degree due to that student's failure to pay any loan
payments, fines, fees, tuition, or other expenses owed to the institution.
of 2

(c) This section shall apply to all postsecondary institutions including: (i) the system of
public institutions of higher education, established in section 5; (ii) private occupational schools,
as defined in section 263 of chapter 112; and (iii) private colleges, universities and other
institutions of higher learning.
(d) The department of higher education shall promulgate regulations consistent with this
section necessary for its implementation.
of 2